Hawaii statutes.
§201M-3 Small business statement after
public hearing. (a) For any proposed rule that affects small business,
the agency shall also submit a small business statement to the small business
regulatory review board and the departmental advisory committee on small
business after the public hearing is held. This section shall not apply to
emergency rules. The small business statement required by this section shall
provide the following information:

(1) A description of how opinions or
comments from affected small business were solicited, a summary of the public
and small business comments, and a summary of the agency's response to those
com­ments;

(2) The number of persons who:

(A) Attended the public hearing;

(B) Testified at the hearing; and

(C) Submitted written comments; and

(3) If there was a request to change the
proposed rule at the hearing in a way that affected small business, a statement
of the reasons for adopting the proposed rule, the reason why a requested
change was not made, and the problems or negative result the change would
provide if adopted.

(b) If the small business regulatory review
board finds that a statement provided pursuant to subsection (a)(3):

(1) Indicates inconsistency with any of the
agency's determinations under section 201M-2(b); or

(2) Does not address the concerns of public
input,

the board with good cause may request a written
response from the agency explaining the rationale used to deny the public
concerns within ten working days of receipt of the small business statement
after public hearing. The agency shall respond in writing to the board's
concerns within ten working days.

(c) The written response from an agency
required in subsection (b), at a minimum, shall:

(1) Specifically address
each issue and concern raised in the board's request for a written response;
and

(2) Affirmatively state that the agency has
considered all written and oral testimony received at the agency's public
hearing and has addressed all issues or concerns raised in the written and oral
testimony. [L 1998, c 168, pt of §2, §5; am L 2002, c 202, §5;
am L 2012, c 241, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next